Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3905
Operator, owner, or lessee; prohibited
acts; signed statement required; when; consent; proof of age; duties.

It shall
be unlawful for an operator, an owner of a tanning facility, or a lessee of
a tanning facility to allow any person less than sixteen years of age to use
tanning equipment at the tanning facility unless the person is accompanied
by a parent or legal guardian. Before each use of tanning equipment by any
person less than sixteen years of age, the operator, owner, or lessee shall
secure a statement signed at the tanning facility by the minor's parent or
legal guardian stating that the person signing the statement is the minor's
parent or legal guardian, that the parent or legal guardian has read and understood
the warnings given by the tanning facility, that the parent or legal guardian
consents to the minor's use of tanning equipment, and that the parent or legal
guardian agrees that the minor will use protective eyewear while using the
tanning equipment. The operator, owner, or lessee shall require proof of age
from each person before allowing the person access to tanning equipment. For
purposes of this section, proof of age shall include, but not be limited to,
a driver's license or other government-issued identification containing the
person's date of birth and photograph or digital image.

Laws 2014, LB132, § 5.